Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6259.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16y. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.520b(2) Person A First degree criminal sexual conduct Life 750.520c Person CA Second degree criminal sexual conduct 15Life 750.520d Person BA Third degree criminal sexual conduct 15Life 750.520e Person G Fourth degree criminal sexual conduct 2 750.520g(1) Person D Assault with intent to commit sexual penetration 10 750.520g(2) Person E Assault with intent to commit sexual contact 5 750.520n Pub saf G Electronic monitoring device violation 2 750.528 Pub saf F Destroying dwelling house or other property during riot or unlawful assembly 4 750.528a Pub saf F Civil disorders â firearms/explosives 4 750.529 Person A Armed robbery Life 750.529a Person A Carjacking Life 750.530 Person C Unarmed robbery 15 750.531 Person C Bank robbery/safebreaking Life 750.532 Person H Seduction 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06854'26) or House Bill No. 6261 (request no. H06854'26). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06855'26) or House Bill No. 6262 (request no. H06855'26).